Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2618
Rental assistive device reimbursement; when.

(1) If an assistive device covered by a manufacturer's express warranty is tendered by a consumer to the dealer from whom it was purchased or exchanged for the repair of any nonconformity to which the warranty is applicable and at least one of the conditions described in subdivision (a) or (b) of this subsection exists, the manufacturer shall provide directly to the consumer for the duration of the repair period a rental assistive device reimbursement of up to twenty dollars per day. The applicable conditions are:

(a) The repair period exceeds ten working days, including the day on which the device is tendered to the dealer for repair; or

(b) The nonconformity is the same for which the assistive device has been tendered to the dealer for repair on at least two previous occasions.

(2) The provisions of this section regarding a manufacturer's duty shall apply for the period of the manufacturer's express warranty or for one year from delivery of the assistive device to the consumer, whichever period of time is longer.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 18.